Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska57-203
Forfeited lease; failure to surrender; publication of notice; landowner's affidavit; contents.

The owner of the land may, after ten days from the date of service, registration, or publication of the notice, provided for by section 57-202, file with the register of deeds of the county where the land is situated an affidavit setting forth (1) that the affiant is the owner of the land; (2) that the lessee, his successors or assigns, have failed and neglected to comply with the terms of the lease, reciting the facts constituting such failure; (3) that the same has been forfeited and is void; and (4) a copy of the notice served and the manner and time of the service thereof.

Laws 1925, c. 133, § 1, p. 350;

C.S.1929, § 57-201;

R.S.1943, § 57-203;

Laws 1955, c. 214, § 3, p. 601;

Laws 1963, c. 324, § 1, p. 982.